Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,127
Action by claimant against incumbent of office; information; trial.

When the defendant is holding an office to which another is claiming the right, the information should set forth the name of such claimant, and the trial must, if practicable, determine the rights of the contesting parties.

R.S.1867, Code § 710, p. 518;

R.S.1913, § 8334;

C.S.1922, § 9286;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,118;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,127.

When the defendant is holding an office claimed by another, the trial court must determine the rights of the contesting parties. Sorensen v. Swanson, 181 Neb. 205, 147 N.W.2d 620 (1967).

If by Attorney General, respondent must prove right to office. State ex rel. Blessing v. Davis, 64 Neb. 499, 90 N.W. 232 (1902).

Where individual is relator, he must prove right to office. State ex rel. Birkhauser v. Moores, 52 Neb. 634, 72 N.W. 1056 (1897).

Quo warranto will lie where it is claimed that person is ineligible to hold office. State ex rel. Thayer v. Boyd, 31 Neb. 682, 48 N.W. 739 (1891), 51 N.W. 602 (1892).